Illinois, session 104th, HB579.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Section 5-90 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-90)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1005-90)7    Sec. 5-90. Joint Committee on Administrative Rules. 8    (a) The The Joint Committee on Administrative Rules is 9established as a legislative support services agency subject 10to the Legislative Commission Reorganization Act of 1984. When 11feasible, the agenda of each meeting of the Joint Committee 12shall be submitted to the Secretary of State to be published at 13least 5 days before the meeting in the Illinois Register. The 14Joint Committee may also weekly, or as often as necessary, 15submit for publication in the Illinois Register lists of the 16dates on which notices under Section 5-40 were received and 17the dates on which the proposed rulemakings will be 18considered. The provisions of this subsection shall not 19prohibit the Joint Committee from acting upon an item that was 20not contained in the published agenda.21    (b) The Joint Committee may charge reasonable fees for 22copies of documents or publications to cover the cost of 23copying or printing. The Joint Committee shall, however,   HB0579- 2 -LRB104 04445 BDA 14472 b1provide copies of documents or publications without cost to 2agencies that are directly affected by recommendations or 3findings included in the documents or publications.4(Source: P.A. 87-823.)